District of Columbia statutes.
44-1002.01

Purpose of receivership.

The purpose of a receivership authorized under this subchapter shall be to safeguard the health, safety, and welfare of a facility’s residents when seriously endangered, to ensure their continuity of care, to safeguard their rights as recognized by District and federal law, and to protect them from the increased stress and risk of trauma often associated with abrupt or unplanned transfer and discharge. A receiver appointed under this subchapter shall not take any actions or assume any responsibilities inconsistent with this purpose. Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to limit or abrogate any other common-law or statutory right to petition for receivership.

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 201, 33 DCR 1510
1981 Ed., § 32-1411.